Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,237
Animal Damage Control Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) There is hereby created the Animal Damage Control Cash Fund. Such fund shall be administered by the Department of Agriculture. The fund shall consist of funds received from any source to carry out the animal damage control program pursuant to section 81-2,236. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate twenty-six thousand dollars for fiscal year 2026-27 from the Animal Damage Control Cash Fund to the Department of Agriculture to carry out the animal damage control program pursuant to section 81-2,236.

Laws 1987, LB 102, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 102;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 183.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.